Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 18. Recognition of EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact.
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.

History.

2016, cc. 75, 107.

Cross references.

As to out-of-state emergency medical services providers, see §

32.1-111.9:1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 75 and 107, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2021, if the Recognition of EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact has not become effective as a result of enactment of the compact into law by at least 10 member states by that date.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that ten states have enacted the compact.

Acts 2016, cc. 75 and 107, cl. 3 provides: “That the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board shall review decisions of the Interstate Commission for Emergency Medical Services Personnel Practice established pursuant to this compact and, upon approval by the Interstate Commission for Emergency Medical Services Personnel Practice of any action that will have the result of increasing the cost to the Commonwealth of membership in the compact, may recommend to the General Assembly that the Commonwealth withdraw from the compact.”

Acts 2016, c. 79, cl. 1, effective March 1, 2016, provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall undertake efforts to establish collaborative agreements with other states, particularly those states that share a border with the Commonwealth, for the interstate recognition of certifications of emergency medical services providers for the purpose of allowing emergency medical services providers to enter into other states to provide emergency medical services and shall report to the General Assembly regarding the status of such efforts no later than November 1, 2016.”